apertium-lat.lat.dix
    <pardef n="Rom/a__np">
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ae</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ae</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>am</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ae</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <!-- Prepositions -->
    <pardef n="ab__pr">
      <e><p><l></l>            <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="et__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l/>        <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ut__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l/>        <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quasi__adv">
      <e><p><l/>         <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="o__ij">
      <e><p><l/>         <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="que__enc">
      <e><p><l>que</l>      <r><j/>que<s n="enc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tot/us__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ius</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orum</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ius</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arum</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ius</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orum</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="apud"><i>apud</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="circum"><i>circum</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="contra"><i>contra</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="e"><i>e</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="gratia"><i>gratia</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="intra"><i>intra</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="per"><i>per</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="procul"><i>procul</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sine"><i>sine</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="trans"><i>trans</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="an"><i>an</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="atque"><i>atque</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nec"><i>nec</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vel"><i>vel</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="totus"><i>tot</i><par n="tot/us__prn"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cur"><i>cur</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="donec"><i>donec</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="dum"><i>dum</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="etiamsi"><i>etiamsi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="etsi"><i>etsi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nisi"><i>nisi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nonne"><i>nonne</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="posteaquam"><i>posteaquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="postquam"><i>postquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="praeterquam"><i>praeterquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="priusquam"><i>priusquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quamvis"><i>quamvis</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quia"><i>quia</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sed"><i>sed</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sicut"><i>sicut</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ubi"><i>ubi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ut"><i>ut</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="bene"><i>bene</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="inferius"><i>inferius</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="partim"><i>partim</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="subito"><i>subito</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="bene"><i>bene</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Roma"><i>Rom</i><par n="Rom/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Italia"><i>Itali</i><par n="Rom/a__np"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="actutum"><i>actutum</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ad"><i>ad</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="age agite"><i>age agite</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="alas! oh!"><i>alas! oh!</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="an"><i>an</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="atque/ac"><i>atque/ac</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="au!"><i>au!</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="babae or papae"><i>babae or papae</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ceu"><i>ceu</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="circiter"><i>circiter</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cocococo"><i>cocococo</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="comminus"><i>comminus</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="contra"><i>contra</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="diserte"><i>diserte</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="dummodo"><i>dummodo</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ecce"><i>ecce</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="eheu"><i>eheu</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="en or em"><i>en or em</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="erga"><i>erga</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="etenim"><i>etenim</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="euhoe"><i>euhoe</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ferme"><i>ferme</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="hercle or hercule"><i>hercle or hercule</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="heus"><i>heus</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="hoc"><i>hoc</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="imprudens imprudentis"><i>imprudens imprudentis</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="inter"><i>inter</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="io"><i>io</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="licet"><i>licet</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ma"><i>ma</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="mactus –a –um"><i>mactus –a –um</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="mehercule/mehercules"><i>mehercule/mehercules</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="miserabile"><i>miserabile</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nec"><i>nec</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="neque/nec"><i>neque/nec</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="perfacete"><i>perfacete</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="posteaquam"><i>posteaquam</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="pro"><i>pro</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="pro (proh)"><i>pro (proh)</i><par n="o__ij"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quam primum"><i>quam primum</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quandoquidem"><i>quandoquidem</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quod"><i>quod</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quoniam"><i>quoniam</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="saltem"><i>saltem</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sicubi"><i>sicubi</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="siquidem"><i>siquidem</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="supra"><i>supra</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="tum or tunc"><i>tum or tunc</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ut or uti"><i>ut or uti</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
